Maryland, session 2025, HB0370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–404.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0370*

HOUSE BILL 370
(2) (i) “Abuse” means an employee’s intentional misconduct or misuse
of authority or position:
1. Involving property or funds of the local school system that
is improper or deficient when compared to conduct a prudent person would consider
reasonable under the same facts and circumstances; or
2. For the purpose of furthering improperly the private
interests of the employee, a family member, or a close personal or business associate.
(ii) “Abuse” includes:
1. Theft or misappropriation of property or funds of the local
school system; and
2. Destruction or alteration of official records.
(3) (i) “Fraud” means an intentional act or attempt to obtain something
of value from the local school system or another person through willful misrepresentation.
(ii) “Fraud” includes a willful false representation of a material fact,
whether by words or by conduct, by false or misleading allegations, or by concealment of
that which should have been disclosed, that causes the local school system to act, or fail to
act, to the detriment of the interest of the local school system.
(4) “Local school system” means the Prince George’s County public school
system.
(5) “Office” means the Office of Integrity and Compliance in the local school
system.
(6) “Vendor” means a party obligated by contract or subcontract to provide
goods, services, or property to the local school system for consideration, including contracts
and subcontracts for construction and professional services related to construction.
(7) (i) “Waste” means an inappropriate act or omission by an employee
with control over or access to local school system property or funds that unreasonably
deprives the local school system of value.
(ii) “Waste” includes mismanagement or other unintentional
conduct that is deficient or improper when compared to conduct that a prudent person
would consider necessary to preserve the value of property or funds of the local school
system under the same facts and circumstances.
(b) This section applies only in Prince George’s County.

HOUSE BILL 370 3
(c) (1) There is an Office of Integrity and Compliance in the local school
system.
(2) [The Office is an independent unit within the local school system] THE
PURPOSE OF THE OFFICE IS TO:
(I) REVIEW THE EFFECTIVENESS AND EFFICIENCY OF
PROGRAMS AND OPERATIONS OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) PREVENT AND DETECT FRAUD, WASTE, AND ABUSE IN THE
OPERATIONS OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(III) PROPOSE WAYS TO INCREASE THE LEGAL, FISCAL, AND
ETHICAL ACCOUNTABILITY OF THE COUNTY BOARD AND THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM.
(3) (i) The County [Council] EXECUTIVE of Prince George’s County,
WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE COUNTY COUNCIL, shall select, appoint, and
contract with an Integrity and Compliance Officer.
(ii) The County [Council] EXECUTIVE shall select the Integrity and
Compliance Officer solely on the basis of professional ability and personal integrity, without
regard to political affiliation.
(iii) The Integrity and Compliance Officer must be qualified
professionally by experience or education in auditing, government operations, or financial
management.
(d) (1) The term of the Integrity and Compliance Officer is 4 years beginning
on the date of appointment.
(2) An individual may not serve as Integrity and Compliance Officer for
more than three terms.
(3) The Integrity and Compliance Officer continues to serve until a
successor is appointed.
(4) If a vacancy occurs for the Integrity and Compliance Officer, the County
[Council] EXECUTIVE shall appoint an Interim Integrity and Compliance Officer to serve
for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(5) The County Council may remove the Integrity and Compliance Officer
only through a majority vote of the County Council for neglect of duty, malfeasance,
conviction of a felony, or other good cause.

HOUSE BILL 370
(6) The Integrity and Compliance Officer shall serve as an independent
employee within the [local school system] COUNTY GOVERNMENT, SUBJECT TO REVIEW
AND OVERSIGHT BY THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OFFICE OF ETHICS AND
ACCOUNTABILITY.
(7) The Integrity and Compliance Officer shall discharge the duties of office
on a full–time basis and with no secondary employment of any nature during the Integrity
and Compliance Officer’s term.
(8) THE COUNTY ATTORNEY SHALL PROVIDE LEGAL SERVICES TO
THE OFFICE AND MAY EMPLOY SPECIAL LEGAL COUNSEL FOR THE OFFICE.
(e) (1) The Office shall:
(i) Assist the County Council and the local school system by
providing independent evaluation and recommendations regarding opportunities to:
1. Preserve the local school system’s reputation; and
2. Improve the effectiveness, productivity, or efficiency of
local school system programs, policies, practices, and operations;
(ii) Ensure public accountability by preventing, investigating, and
reporting instances of fraud, waste, and abuse of property or funds of the local school
system;
(iii) Examine, evaluate, and report on the adequacy and effectiveness
of the systems of internal controls and their related accounting, financial, technology, and
operational policies; and
(iv) Report noncompliance with and propose ways to improve
employee compliance with applicable law, policy, and ethical standards of conduct.
(2) (i) The Office may employ staff in order to execute the duties of the
Office.
(ii) Staff employed by the Office shall serve under the supervision
and direction of the Integrity and Compliance Officer.
(3) In developing recommendations, the Office may:
(i) Conduct administrative investigations, budgetary analyses, and
financial, management, or performance audits and similar reviews;
(ii) Provide management advisories; and

HOUSE BILL 370 5
(iii) Utilize the assistance from any other government agency or
private party to complete a project initiated by the Office.
(4) (I) When applicable, the Integrity and Compliance Officer shall
comply with generally accepted government auditing standards.
(II) THE INTEGRITY AND COMPLIANCE OFFICER MAY NOT
CREATE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS FOR THE COUNTY OR THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM.
(5) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
Integrity and Compliance Officer shall, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY OFFICE OF ETHICS AND ACCOUNTABILITY, publish IN A READILY
AVAILABLE LOCATION on the Office’s website AND LINKED TO OTHER COUNTY
WEBSITES[, in a readily available location]:
1. [A] AN ANNUAL report [at least once every 2 years],
beginning in fiscal year 2025, that summarizes the activities, findings, recommendations,
and accomplishments of the Office; and
2. Any official written comments or responses offered by the
local school system administration with any report published by the Office.
(ii) The Integrity and Compliance Officer:
1. May not disclose any record, report, or related information
that is protected from disclosure under the Public Information Act;
2. May provide an oral report if appropriate under generally
accepted government auditing standards; and
3. Shall establish and follow procedures for safeguarding the
identity of confidential sources and protecting privileged and confidential information.
(6) If reasonable grounds exist to believe that a serious violation of federal,
State, or local law has occurred, the Integrity and Compliance Officer shall report the
allegation to:
(i) An appropriate law enforcement agency;
(ii) The State Ethics Commission; or
(iii) Any other agency with jurisdiction to enforce the law.
(f) (1) [The] EACH YEAR, THE Integrity and Compliance Officer shall
coordinate with the local school system to develop a written work plan WITH THE

HOUSE BILL 370
OBJECTIVES, METRICS, PRIORITIES, AND SCHEDULED AUDITS AND INVESTIGATIONS
OF THE OFFICE, BASED ON THE MOST RECENT RISK ASSESSMENT, and establish
periodic goals and priorities for the Office based on an assessment of relative risks.
(2) In developing the work plan, the Integrity and Compliance Officer shall
take into consideration requests from:
(i) Officers, administrators, and employees of the local school
system;
(ii) Elected officials; and
(iii) Members of the public.
(3) The Integrity and Compliance Officer shall [make the written work
plan available to the public, subject to the Public Information Act] TRANSMIT THE WORK
PLAN TO THE COUNTY BOARD BY JUNE 15 OF EACH YEAR.
(4) ON APPROVAL OF THE WORK PLAN BY THE COUNTY BOARD, THE
INTEGRITY AND COMPLIANCE OFFICER SHALL TRANSMIT THE WORK PLAN TO THE
COUNTY COUNCIL FOR PUBLIC HEARING AND APPROVAL.
(5) AFTER A PUBLIC HEARING HAS BEEN HELD AND ON APPROVAL OF
THE WORK PLAN BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL, THE INTEGRITY AND COMPLIANCE
OFFICER SHALL MAKE THE WORK PLAN PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE OFFICE’S
WEBSITE, SUBJECT TO THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
(6) (I) 1. EACH YEAR, THE INTEGRITY AND COMPLIANCE
OFFICER SHALL COMPLETE AND PRESENT A RISK ASSESSMENT TO THE COUNTY
BOARD BY APRIL 1 FOR PUBLIC HEARING AND APPROVAL.
2. THE RISK ASSESSMENT SHALL SUMMARIZE THE
POTENTIAL RISKS TO LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM OPERATIONS, FINANCES, AND
COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS AND REGULATIONS.
(II) 1. THE COUNTY BOARD MAY ACCEPT, REJECT, OR
MODIFY THE RISK ASSESSMENT.
2. THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL TRANSMIT THE RISK
ASSESSMENT AND A FINAL WRITTEN DECISION TO THE COUNTY COUNCIL BY MAY 1.
(III) THE COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING ON
THE RISK ASSESSMENT AND ANY UPDATES TO THE RISK ASSESSMENT.

HOUSE BILL 370 7
(IV) THE COUNTY COUNCIL MAY ACCEPT, REJECT, OR MODIFY
THE RISK ASSESSMENT, AND SHALL INCORPORATE APPROPRIATE PUBLIC
COMMENTS INTO THE RISK ASSESSMENT BEFORE APPROVAL.
(V) ON APPROVAL OF THE RISK ASSESSMENT BY THE COUNTY
COUNCIL, THE RISK ASSESSMENT SHALL BE PUBLISHED ON THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE.
(VI) THE RISK ASSESSMENT SHALL BE UPDATED ANNUALLY, OR
MORE FREQUENTLY AS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL.
(VII) THE OFFICE SHALL INCLUDE WITH THE PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE RISK ASSESSMENT SUMMARIES OF FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS
IN PLAIN LANGUAGE.
(7) (I) 1. EACH YEAR, THE OFFICE SHALL PREPARE A REPORT
SUMMARIZING THE ACTIVITIES, FINDINGS, RECOMMENDATIONS, AND
ACCOMPLISHMENTS OF THE OFFICE FOR THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR.
2. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE PROGRESS MADE ON
THE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, METRICS, AND PRIORITIES OUTLINED IN THE WORK PLAN.
(II) THE REPORT SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE COUNTY BOARD
BY JUNE 30 FOR REVIEW AND APPROVAL.
(III) ON APPROVAL OF THE REPORT BY THE COUNTY BOARD, THE
OFFICE SHALL TRANSMIT THE REPORT TO THE COUNTY COUNCIL BY JULY 15 FOR
APPROVAL.
(IV) ON APPROVAL OF THE REPORT BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL,
THE REPORT SHALL BE PUBLISHED ON THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE AND SHALL INCLUDE
WRITTEN COMMENTS OR RESPONSES BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM, THE COUNTY
COUNCIL, AND THE PUBLIC.
(g) (1) (i) On request from the Integrity and Compliance Officer, an
employee or official of the local school system shall provide promptly to the Integrity and
Compliance Officer any available document or other information concerning the local school
system’s operations, budget, programs, or vendor contracts.
(ii) AN EMPLOYEE OR OFFICIAL OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
MAY NOT CREATE ANY DOCUMENT, INFORMATION, OR REPORT FOR THE INTEGRITY
AND COMPLIANCE OFFICER.
(III) 1. The Integrity and Compliance Officer shall notify the
county board and the County Superintendent if any employee or official of the local school

HOUSE BILL 370
system fails to provide any information or document requested under this paragraph with
reasonable promptness.
2. The county board and the County Superintendent shall
take appropriate administrative action to produce local school system compliance with a
pending request for information by the Integrity and Compliance Officer.
(2) (i) On request from the Integrity and Compliance Officer, a vendor
of the local school system shall provide promptly to the Integrity and Compliance Officer
any available document or other information concerning any local school system vendor
contract, including documents related to the procurement of the contract.
(ii) 1. The Integrity and Compliance Officer shall notify the
county board, the County Superintendent, and the local school system if any vendor fails
to provide any information or document requested under this paragraph with reasonable
promptness.
2. The county board and the County Superintendent shall
take appropriate administrative or civil action to produce vendor compliance with a
pending request for information by the Integrity and Compliance Officer.
(h) (1) Each local school system employee should report any fraud, waste, or
abuse to the Office.
(2) A local school system employee, vendor, or employee of any vendor may
not be retaliated against or penalized, or threatened with retaliation or penalty, for
providing information to, cooperating with, or in any way assisting the Integrity and
Compliance Officer in connection with any activity authorized by this section.
(3) The Integrity and Compliance Officer may not disclose the identity of a
person that reports an allegation of fraud, waste, or abuse unless:
(i) The reporting person consents to disclosure of the person’s
identity;
(ii) Disclosure is reasonably necessary to complete an audit or
investigation; or
(iii) Another person is legally entitled to disclosure of the identity of
the reporting person.
(i) (1) The Integrity and Compliance Officer may administer an oath or
affirmation or take an affidavit from any person if necessary to perform the duties under
this section.

HOUSE BILL 370 9
(2) The Integrity and Compliance Officer may administer an oath and take
a deposition and other testimony for the purpose of investigating fraud, waste, or abuse
within the local school system.
(3) The Integrity and Compliance Officer may subpoena any person or
evidence for the purpose of investigating fraud, waste, or abuse within the local school
system.
(4) If a person fails to comply with a lawful order or subpoena issued under
this subsection, on petition of the Integrity and Compliance Officer, a court of competent
jurisdiction may compel:
(i) Compliance with the order or subpoena; or
(ii) Testimony or the production of evidence.
(j) (1) Each year the Integrity and Compliance Officer shall submit to the
[county board] COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND THE COUNTY COUNCIL a projected budget for
the Office for the upcoming fiscal year.
(2) [The county board shall include in the county board’s annual operating
budget proposal the amounts recommended by the Integrity and Compliance Officer for the
Office for the upcoming fiscal year] SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE OFFICE’S
PROJECTED BUDGET BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL, THE PROJECTED BUDGET SHALL
BE INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGET PROPOSAL OF THE COUNTY.
(3) (I) FOLLOWING SUBMISSION OF THE PROPOSED BUDGET, THE
INTEGRITY AND COMPLIANCE OFFICER SHALL PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT
SUMMARIZING THE ACTIVITIES, FINDINGS, RECOMMENDATIONS, AND
ACCOMPLISHMENTS OF THE OFFICE FOR THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR.
(II) THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT THE ANNUAL REPORT TO THE
COUNTY COUNCIL FOR REVIEW AND APPROVAL BEFORE PUBLICATION.
(III) ON APPROVAL BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL, THE ANNUAL
REPORT SHALL BE PUBLISHED ON THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE.
(IV) THE PUBLISHED ANNUAL REPORT SHALL INCLUDE THE
OBJECTIVES, METRICS, PRIORITIES, SCHEDULED AUDITS, AND INVESTIGATIONS OF
THE OFFICE, BASED ON THE MOST RECENT RISK ASSESSMENT, WITH ANY WRITTEN
COMMENTS OR RESPONSES BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(V) THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL HIGHLIGHT PROGRESS
TOWARD THE GOALS AND PRIORITIES OUTLINED IN THE APPROVED WORK PLAN.

HOUSE BILL 370
(4) (I) THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL DEMONSTRATE COST SAVINGS
TO THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM THAT ARE AT LEAST FOUR TIMES THE AMOUNT OF
THE ANNUAL BUDGET OF THE OFFICE.
(II) IF THE OFFICE FAILS TO MEET THE COST SAVINGS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE OFFICE SHALL BE
ABOLISHED IN THE SUBSEQUENT FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.